Vermont, session 2025-2026, H327.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 205a is added to read:
§ 205a. REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN ENERGY FACILITIES
(a) For any energy generation facility it constructs after January 1, 2025, a
corporation subject to supervision under this chapter shall submit to the
Commission within 60 days after construction is completed:
(1) a certified copy of any contract for the energy generation facility
with a line-item budget; and
VT LEG #380945 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.327
2025 Page 2 of 2
(2) an attestation that each contract awarded for any energy generation
facility with a construction cost exceeding $100,000.00:
(A) was constructed using unionized labor paid not less than the
prevailing wage published periodically by the Vermont Department of Labor
in its occupational employment and wage survey plus an additional fringe
benefit of 42.5 percent of wage, as calculated by the current Vermont
prevailing wage survey; or
(B) if unionized labor was not available, was constructed by
employees paid not less than the mean prevailing wage published periodically
by the Vermont Department of Labor in its occupational employment and
wage survey plus an additional fringe benefit of 42.5 percent of wage, as
calculated by the current Vermont prevailing wage survey.
(b) As used in this section, “fringe benefits” means benefits, including paid
vacations and holidays, sick leave, employer contributions and reimbursements
to health insurance and retirement benefits, and similar benefits that are
incidents of employment.
(c) The Commission shall make the documents required under this section
available for public review, with any personally identifiable information
redacted.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380945 v.2